District of Columbia statutes.
32-1510

Occupational disease.

In case of pneumoconiosis, such as silicosis and asbestosis, radiation diseases, and any other generally recognized occupational disease, liability for compensation rests with the employer of the last known exposure.

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 11, 27 DCR 2503

History

1981 Ed., § 36-310.

Prior Codifications